Maryland, session 2025, SB0736.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
10–423.2.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE WILDLIFE DAMAGE PREVENTION
AND REIMBURSEMENT FUND.
(B) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT IT IS IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST
TO PROVIDE FUNDING TO REIMBURSE A PERSON WHO HAS SUSTAINED DAMAGE TO
AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTS AS A RESULT OF DEER, GEESE, AND OTHER WILDLIFE.
(C) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO DAMAGE CAUSED BY A
DOMESTICATED ANIMAL OR A BLACK BEAR.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0736*

SENATE BILL 736
(D) (1) THERE IS A WILDLIFE DAMAGE PREVENTION AND
REIMBURSEMENT FUND IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO REIMBURSE A PERSON FOR
DAMAGE CAUSED BY DEER, GEESE, AND OTHER WILDLIFE TO CROPS AND OTHER
AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTS.
(3) THE SECRETARY SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(4) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(I) PROCEEDS FROM THE SALE OF A CONSERVATION DEER
STAMP OR DECAL THAT MAY BE PURCHASED AT A COST OF $5 FOR EACH STAMP OR
DECAL;
(II) GIFTS, GRANTS, AND CONTRIBUTIONS TO THE STATE THAT
ARE DESIGNATED FOR INCLUSION IN THE FUND; AND
(III) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE
FUND.
(5) THE FUND IS A CONTINUING, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(6) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ACCEPT REQUESTS FOR GRANTS FROM
THE FUND FOR PROJECTS THAT SEEK TO PREVENT DAMAGE CAUSED BY DEER,
GEESE, OR OTHER WILDLIFE.
(2) IN DETERMINING PROJECTS THAT ARE ELIGIBLE FOR GRANTS,
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSIDER PROJECTS THAT:
(I) REDUCE THE AVAILABILITY OF ATTRACTANTS TO DEER,
GEESE, OR OTHER WILDLIFE IN COMMUNITIES, INCLUDING AGRICULTURAL
COMMUNITIES;
(II) HAVE LOCAL COMMUNITY SUPPORT OR A DETAILED PLAN
TO BUILD LOCAL COMMUNITY SUPPORT;

SENATE BILL 736 3
(III) ARE COST–EFFECTIVE INVESTMENTS THAT HAVE THE
POTENTIAL TO CONTINUE TO BE EFFECTIVE BEYOND THE TIME FRAME FOR THE
GRANT FUNDING; OR
(IV) INCLUDE MATCHING FUNDS OR AN IN–KIND MATCH.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT AWARD A GRANT FOR:
(I) STAND–ALONE RESEARCH, DATA COLLECTION, AND
ANALYSIS; OR
(II) THE DIRECT GENERATION OF REVENUE OR PROFIT.
(4) ENTITIES ELIGIBLE FOR A GRANT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
INCLUDE:
(I) LOCAL GOVERNMENTS;
(II) PARKS AND RECREATION DEPARTMENTS;
(III) LANDOWNERS;
(IV) FARMERS;
(V) BUSINESSES;
(VI) TRIBES;
(VII) INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION; AND
(VIII) NONPROFIT ORGANIZATIONS.
(5) GRANT FUNDING UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE CAPPED AT
AN AMOUNT THAT LEAVES AT LEAST 10% OF THE TOTAL ANNUAL APPROPRIATION
UNDER SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION AVAILABLE FOR DAMAGE
REIMBURSEMENT UNDER SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION.
(F) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REIMBURSE A PERSON FROM THE FUND
FOR DAMAGE CAUSED BY DEER, GEESE, AND OTHER WILDLIFE TO THE PERSON’S
CROPS OR AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTS.
(2) A PERSON IS ELIGIBLE TO BE REIMBURSED FROM THE FUND FOR
DAMAGE CAUSED BY DEER, GEESE, OR OTHER WILDLIFE IF:

SENATE BILL 736
(I) THE PERSON HAS FOLLOWED ALL RELEVANT WILDLIFE
DAMAGE PREVENTIVE MEASURES RECOMMENDED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
(II) THE DAMAGE AMOUNT IS DETERMINED BY AN EXTENSION
AGENT OF THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND COOPERATIVE EXTENSION SERVICE;
AND
(III) THE DEPARTMENT HAS VERIFIED THAT THE DAMAGE WAS
CAUSED BY DEER, GEESE, OR OTHER WILDLIFE.
(3) SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE FUNDING, A PERSON MAY BE
REIMBURSED FROM THE FUND FOR DAMAGE CAUSED BY DEER, GEESE, OR OTHER
WILDLIFE IN AN AMOUNT NOT LESS THAN $200 AND NOT MORE THAN $5,000 PER
YEAR.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
(H) FOR EACH FISCAL YEAR, THE GOVERNOR MAY INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL
BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF AT LEAST $50,000 TO THE FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.